Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1

Tennessee Governor's Council on Physical Fitness and Health [Repealed]

4-40-101. [Repealed.]

Acts 1991, ch. 175, § 1; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 502, § 2, effective February 28, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 4, ch. 40, part 1, §§4-40-101 —4-40-151, concerned the Tennessee governor's council on physical fitness and health.

Acts 2014, ch. 502, § 3 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee governor's council on physical fitness and health, created by §4-40-101, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

4-40-102. [Repealed.]

Acts 1991, ch. 175, § 2; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 502, § 2, effective February 28, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 4, ch. 40, part 1, §§4-40-101 —4-40-151, concerned the Tennessee governor's council on physical fitness and health.

Acts 2014, ch. 502, § 3 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee governor's council on physical fitness and health, created by §4-40-101, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

4-40-103. [Repealed.]

Acts 1991, ch. 175, § 3; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 502, § 2, effective February 28, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 4, ch. 40, part 1, §§4-40-101 —4-40-151, concerned the Tennessee governor's council on physical fitness and health.

Acts 2014, ch. 502, § 3 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee governor's council on physical fitness and health, created by §4-40-101, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

4-40-104. [Repealed.]

Acts 1991, ch. 175, § 6; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 502, § 2, effective February 28, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 4, ch. 40, part 1, §§4-40-101 —4-40-151, concerned the Tennessee governor's council on physical fitness and health.

Acts 2014, ch. 502, § 3 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee governor's council on physical fitness and health, created by §4-40-101, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

4-40-105. [Repealed.]

Acts 1991, ch. 175, § 8; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 502, § 2, effective February 28, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 4, ch. 40, part 1, §§4-40-101 —4-40-151, concerned the Tennessee governor's council on physical fitness and health.

Acts 2014, ch. 502, § 3 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee governor's council on physical fitness and health, created by §4-40-101, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

4-40-106. [Repealed.]

Acts 1991, ch. 175, § 9; repealed by Acts 2014, ch. 502, § 2, effective February 28, 2014.

Compiler's Notes. Former title 4, ch. 40, part 1, §§4-40-101 —4-40-151, concerned the Tennessee governor's council on physical fitness and health.

Acts 2014, ch. 502, § 3 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee governor's council on physical fitness and health, created by §4-40-101, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

4-40-107 — 4-40-150. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former title 4, ch. 40, part 1, §§4-40-101 —4-40-151, concerned the Tennessee governor's council on physical fitness and health.

Acts 2014, ch. 502, § 3 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee governor's council on physical fitness and health, created by §4-40-101, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.

4-40-151. [Obsolete.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §4-40-151 (Acts 1992, ch. 912, § 1), concerning the nonprofit corporation for Olympic event on Ocoee River, was deleted as obsolete.

Former title 4, ch. 40, part 1, §§4-40-101 —4-40-151, concerned the Tennessee governor's council on physical fitness and health.

Acts 2014, ch. 502, § 3 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the Tennessee governor's council on physical fitness and health, created by §4-40-101, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon February 28, 2014.